District of Columbia statutes.
7-1204.05

Court records; anonymity of parties.

A client, client representative or any other party in a civil, criminal or administrative action, in which mental health information has been or will be disclosed, shall have the right to move the court to denominate, style or caption the names of all parties as “John Doe” or otherwise protect the anonymity of all of the parties.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 405, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2035.
1973 Ed., § 6-1632.